nb: Monteringsposisjon for viftemotor: Førerhus; Foran; Foran til venstre; Foran til høyre; Bak; Bak til venstre; Bak til høyre; Sovekabin; Annet
bg-BG: Позиция на монтаж на двигателя на вентилатора: Кабина; Отпред; Отпред вляво; Отпред вдясно; Отзад; Отзад вляво; Отзад вдясно; Спална кабина; Други
pt-PT: Posição de montagem do motor do ventilador: Cabina; Dianteira; Dianteira esquerda; Dianteira direita; Traseira; Traseira esquerda; Traseira direita; Cabina de dormida; Outros
da: Blæsermotorens monteringsposition: Kabine; For; For venstre; For højre; Bag; Bag venstre; Bag højre; Sovekabine; Andet
hu: Ventilátormotor beépítési pozíciója: Fülke; Elöl; Bal első; Jobb első; Hátul; Bal hátsó; Jobb hátsó; Hálófülke; Egyéb
nl: Ventilatormotor montagepositie: Cabine; Voor; Linksvoor; Rechtsvoor; Achter; Linksachter; Rechtsachter; Slaapcabine; Anders
de: Montageposition des Gebläsemotors: Fahrerhaus; Vorne; Vorne links; Vorne rechts; Hinten; Hinten links; Hinten rechts; Schlafkabine; Sonstige
fr: Position de montage du moteur de soufflerie: Cabine; Avant; Avant gauche; Avant droit; Arrière; Arrière gauche; Arrière droit; Couchette; Autre
es: Posición de montaje del motor del ventilador: Cabina; Delantero; Delantero izquierdo; Delantero derecho; Trasero; Trasero izquierdo; Trasero derecho; Cabina dormitorio; Otro
sl-SI: Položaj namestitve motorja puhalnika: Kabina; Spredaj; Spredaj levo; Spredaj desno; Zadaj; Zadaj levo; Zadaj desno; Spalna kabina; Drugo
vi: Vị trí lắp đặt mô tơ quạt gió: Cabin; Phía trước; Phía trước bên trái; Phía trước bên phải; Phía sau; Phía sau bên trái; Phía sau bên phải; Buồng ngủ; Khác
ko: 블로워모터 장착 위치: 캡; 전면; 전면 좌측; 전면 우측; 후면; 후면 좌측; 후면 우측; 슬리퍼; 기타
pt-BR: Posição de montagem do motor do ventilador: Cabine; Dianteira; Dianteira esquerda; Dianteira direita; Traseira; Traseira esquerda; Traseira direita; Leito; Outro
cs: Montážní poloha motoru ventilátoru: Kabina; Přední; Levá přední; Pravá přední; Zadní; Levá zadní; Pravá zadní; Spací kabina; Jiné
pl: Pozycja montażu silnika dmuchawy: Kabina; Przód; Lewy przód; Prawy przód; Tył; Lewy tył; Prawy tył; Kabina sypialna; Inne
zh-CN: 鼓风机电机安装位置: 驾驶室; 前部; 左前; 右前; 后部; 左后; 右后; 卧铺舱; 其他
it: Posizione di montaggio del motore del ventilatore: Abitacolo; Anteriore; Anteriore sinistro; Anteriore destro; Posteriore; Posteriore sinistro; Posteriore destro; Cuccetta; Altro
sv: Fläktmotorns monteringsläge: Hytt; Fram; Fram vänster; Fram höger; Bak; Bak vänster; Bak höger; Sovhytt; Övrigt
zh-TW: 鼓風機馬達安裝位置: 駕駛艙; 前面; 左前; 右前; 後面; 左後; 右後; 臥鋪; 其他
hr-HR: Položaj montaže motora ventilatora: Kabina; Sprijeda; Sprijeda lijevo; Sprijeda desno; Straga; Straga lijevo; Straga desno; Spavaća kabina; Ostalo
el: Θέση τοποθέτησης μοτέρ ανεμιστήρα: Καμπίνα; Μπροστά; Εμπρός αριστερά; Εμπρός δεξιά; Πίσω; Πίσω αριστερά; Πίσω δεξιά; Χώρος ύπνου; Άλλο
tr: Üfleyici motoru montaj konumu: Kabin; Ön; Ön sol; Ön sağ; Arka; Arka sol; Arka sağ; Yataklı kabin; Diğer
ja: ブロワーモーターの取り付け位置: キャブ; フロント; フロント左; フロント右; リア; リア左; リア右; スリーパー; その他
ru: Положение установки двигателя вентилятора: Кабина; Спереди; Спереди слева; Спереди справа; Сзади; Сзади слева; Сзади справа; Спальное место; Другое
lt-LT: Pūstuvo variklio montavimo padėtis: Kabina; Priekyje; Priekyje kairėje; Priekyje dešinėje; Gale; Gale kairėje; Gale dešinėje; Miegamoji zona; Kita
th: ตำแหน่งการติดตั้งมอเตอร์โบลเวอร์: ห้องโดยสาร; ด้านหน้า; ด้านหน้าซ้าย; ด้านหน้าขวา; ด้านหลัง; ด้านหลังซ้าย; ด้านหลังขวา; ห้องนอน; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Poziția de montare a motorului suflantei: Cabină; Față; Față stânga; Față dreapta; Spate; Spate stânga; Spate dreapta; Cabină de dormit; Altele
en: Blower motor mounting position: Cab; Front; Front left; Front right; Rear; Rear left; Rear right; Sleeper; Other
fi: Puhaltimen moottorin asennussijainti: Ohjaamo; Etuosa; Edessä vasemmalla; Edessä oikealla; Takaosa; Takana vasemmalla; Takana oikealla; Makuuhytti; Muu
sk-SK: Montážna poloha motora ventilátora: Kabína; Vpredu; Vpredu vľavo; Vpredu vpravo; Vzadu; Vzadu vľavo; Vzadu vpravo; Spacia kabína; Iné